District of Columbia statutes.
43-110

Bylaws.

Each corporation shall have power to establish and change bylaws and prescribe rules and regulations for its government and the duties of its officers and the management of its property.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 666
1981 Ed., § 27-110.
1973 Ed., § 27-110.